trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="ser__vb">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>	  
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itan</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itajn</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>intaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ante</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ante</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="verb__vb">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>	  
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itan</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itajn</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inta</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>intaj</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    
 
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ante</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ante</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<pardef n="Barcelona__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="United_States__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="Mark__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

 <pardef n="Mary__np">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>




    <pardef n="CX__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



 <pardef n="one__num">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

 </pardef>

 

    <pardef n="two__num">
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cent</l>
          <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil</l>
          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cent</l>
          <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil</l>
          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cent</l>
          <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil</l>
          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="million__num">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

 </pardef>

<e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Satano"><i>Satano</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Herkulo"><i>Herkulo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jesuo"><i>Jesuo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bazilo"><i>Bazilo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Klaŭdo"><i>Klaŭdo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dario"><i>Dario</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Diego"><i>Diego</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Helena"><i>Helena</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eliza"><i>Eliza</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ilza"><i>Ilza</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Henriko"><i>Henriko</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gerardo"><i>Gerardo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ignaco"><i>Ignaco</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Agnesa"><i>Agnesa</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Izabela"><i>Izabela</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jakobo"><i>Jakobo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĵeromo"><i>Ĵeromo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Johano"><i>Johano</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Julia"><i>Julia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eleonora"><i>Eleonora</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Manuelo"><i>Manuelo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marta"><i>Marta</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nikolao"><i>Nikolao</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Suzana"><i>Suzana</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="America"><i>America</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Korsikio"><i>Korsikio</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yugoslavia"><i>Yugoslavia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Paris"><i>Paris</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vienna"><i>Vienna</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eŭropo"><i>Eŭropo</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kroatio"><i>Kroatio</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Albanio"><i>Albanio</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Indonezio"><i>Indonezio</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sirio"><i>Sirio</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Skotlando"><i>Skotlando</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pakistano"><i>Pakistano</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Burkino"><i>Burkino</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Qatar"><i>Qatar</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Singapuro"><i>Singapuro</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="aperi"><i>aper</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="buliĝi"><i>buliĝ</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="devii"><i>devi</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="ektranĉi"><i>ektranĉ</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="ekzisti"><i>ekzist</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="enŝipiĝi"><i>enŝipiĝ</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="esti"><i>est</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="forlasi"><i>forlas</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="hajli"><i>hajl</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="kampadi"><i>kampad</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="konstati"><i>konstat</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="leki"><i>lek</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="manĝi"><i>manĝ</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="nutri"><i>nutr</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="prokrasti"><i>prokrast</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="senŝeligi"><i>senŝelig</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="torni"><i>torn</i><par n="verb__vb"/></e>
<e lm="du"><i>du</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="tri"><i>tri</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvar"><i>kvar</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="kvin"><i>kvin</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="ses"><i>ses</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="sep"><i>sep</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="nau"><i>nau</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="cent"><i>cent</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dekunu"><i>dekunu</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dektri"><i>dektri</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="dekkvin"><i>dekkvin</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="deksep"><i>deksep</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="deknay"><i>deknay</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="D"><i>D</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="I"><i>I</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="II"><i>II</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="III"><i>III</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="IV"><i>IV</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX"><i>IX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="M"><i>M</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI"><i>VI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII"><i>VIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI"><i>XI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIII"><i>XIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX"><i>XIX</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVI"><i>XVI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII"><i>XVIII</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXI"><i>XXI</i><par n="CX__num"/></e>
